windows/es.aff
SFX W   ortar uerte       ortar
SFX W   orzar uerce       orzar
SFX W   osar  uese        osar
SFX W   ostar ueste       ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestre      ostrar
SFX W   ovar  ueve        ovar
SFX W   gar   egue        ugar
SFX W   cer   zca         [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   ga          [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ga          aler
SFX W   er    iga         aer
SFX W   caber quepa       caber
SFX W   cer   zca         ecer
SFX W   eder  ieda        eder
SFX W   er    a           [eo]er
SFX W   er    iga         oer
SFX W   er    ya          oer
SFX W   ender ienda       ender
SFX W   er    ga          [eo]ner
SFX W   erder ierda       erder
SFX W   erer  iera        erer
SFX W   erner ierna       erner
SFX W   erter ierta       erter
SFX W   ocer  ueza        cocer
SFX W   cer   zca         [^c]ocer
SFX W   oder  ueda        oder
SFX W   oler  uela        oler
SFX W   olver uelva       olver
SFX W   orcer uerza       orcer
SFX W   order uerda       order
SFX W   over  ueva        over
SFX W   aber  epa         saber
SFX W   ir    ga          alir
SFX W   ebir  iba         ebir
SFX W   ecir  iga         ecir
SFX W   edir  ida         edir
SFX W   egir  ija         egir
SFX W   emir  ima         emir
SFX W   eír   ía          eír
SFX W   eñir  iña         eñir
SFX W   eguir iga         eguir
SFX W   enchir incha       enchir
SFX W   endir inda        endir
SFX W   enir  enga        enir
SFX W   entir ienta       entir
SFX W   erir  iera        erir
SFX W   ernir ierna       ernir
SFX W   ertir ierta       ertir
SFX W   ervir irva        [^h]ervir
SFX W   estir ista        estir
SFX W   etir  ita         etir
SFX W   unir  úna         eunir
SFX W   ervir ierva       hervir
SFX W   irir  iera        irir
SFX W   ibir  íba         ohibir
SFX W   ír    iga         oír
SFX W   orir  uera        orir
SFX W   ormir uerma       ormir
SFX W   cir   zca         ucir
SFX W   ir    ya          [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uya         güir
SFX W   ir    a           ullir
SFX W   ir    a           uñir
SFX W   undir únda        ehundir
SFX W   erguir yerga       erguir
SFX W   erguir irga        erguir
SFX W   iar   íes         iar
SFX W   ebrar iebres      ebrar
SFX W   edrar iedres      edrar
SFX W   egar  iegues      egar
SFX W   elar  ieles       elar
SFX W   evar  ieves       evar
SFX W   emblar iembles     emblar
SFX W   embrar iembres     embrar
SFX W   ar    es          andar
SFX W   endar iendes      endar
SFX W   endrar iendres     endrar
SFX W   engar iengues     engar
SFX W   ensar ienses      ensar
SFX W   entar ientes      entar
SFX W   enzar iences      enzar
SFX W   erbar ierbes      erbar
SFX W   ernar iernes      ernar
SFX W   errar ierres      errar
SFX W   ertar iertes      ertar
SFX W   esar  ieses       esar
SFX W   estar iestes      estar
SFX W   etar  ietes       etar
SFX W   ezar  ieces       ezar
SFX W   ijar  íjes        [ae]hijar
SFX W   ilar  íles        [ae]hilar
SFX W   inar  ínes        [aeo]hinar
SFX W   itar  ítes        [ae]hitar
SFX W   umar  úmes        [ae]humar
SFX W   usar  úses        [ae]husar
SFX W   izar  íces        [ae]izar
SFX W   islar ísles       [ae]islar
SFX W   illar ílles       [ae]illar
SFX W   ullar úlles       [ae]ullar
SFX W   unar  únes        aunar
SFX W   ular  úles        aular
SFX W   upar  úpes        aupar
SFX W   inar  ínes        [ae]inar
SFX W   urtar úrtes       ehurtar
SFX W   untar úntes       euntar
SFX W   uar   úes         [^g]uar
SFX W   onzar üences      gonzar
SFX W   uar   ües         guar
SFX W   obar  uebes       obar
SFX W   oblar uebles      oblar
SFX W   ocar  ueques      ocar
SFX W   odar  uedes       odar
SFX W   ogar  uegues      ogar
SFX W   olar  ueles       olar
SFX W   ollar uelles      [^g]ollar
SFX W   oldar üeldes      goldar
SFX W   oldar ueldes      [^g]oldar
SFX W   ollar üelles      gollar
SFX W   olcar uelques     olcar
SFX W   olgar uelgues     olgar
SFX W   oltar ueltes      oltar
SFX W   onar  uenes       onar
SFX W   oñar  ueñes       oñar
SFX W   ontar uentes      ontar
SFX W   ontrar uentres     ontrar
SFX W   orar  ueres       [^g]orar
SFX W   orar  üeres       gorar
SFX W   orcar uerques     orcar
SFX W   ordar uerdes      ordar
SFX W   ornar uernes      ornar
SFX W   ortar uertes      ortar
SFX W   orzar uerces      orzar
SFX W   osar  ueses       osar
SFX W   ostar uestes      ostar
SFX W   ostrar uestres     ostrar
SFX W   ovar  ueves       ovar
SFX W   gar   egues       ugar
SFX W   cer   zcas        [^fh]acer
SFX W   cer   gas         [fh]acer
SFX W   er    gas         aler
SFX W   er    igas        aer
SFX W   caber quepas      caber
SFX W   cer   zcas        ecer
SFX W   eder  iedas       eder
SFX W   er    as          [eo]er
SFX W   er    igas        oer
SFX W   er    yas         oer
SFX W   ender iendas      ender
SFX W   er    gas         [eo]ner
SFX W   erder ierdas      erder
SFX W   erer  ieras       erer
SFX W   erner iernas      erner
SFX W   erter iertas      erter
SFX W   ocer  uezas       cocer
SFX W   cer   zcas        [^c]ocer
SFX W   oder  uedas       oder
SFX W   oler  uelas       oler
SFX W   olver uelvas      olver
SFX W   orcer uerzas      orcer
SFX W   order uerdas      order
SFX W   over  uevas       over
SFX W   aber  epas        saber
SFX W   ir    gas         alir
SFX W   ebir  ibas        ebir
SFX W   ecir  igas        ecir
SFX W   edir  idas        edir
SFX W   egir  ijas        egir
SFX W   emir  imas        emir
SFX W   eír   ías         eír
SFX W   eñir  iñas        eñir
SFX W   eguir igas        eguir
SFX W   enchir inchas      enchir
SFX W   endir indas       endir
SFX W   enir  engas       enir
SFX W   entir ientas      entir
SFX W   erir  ieras       erir
SFX W   ernir iernas      ernir
SFX W   ertir iertas      ertir
SFX W   ervir irvas       [^h]ervir
SFX W   estir istas       estir
SFX W   unir  únas        eunir
SFX W   etir  itas        etir
SFX W   ervir iervas      hervir
SFX W   irir  ieras       irir
SFX W   ibir  íbas        ohibir
SFX W   ír    igas        oír
SFX W   orir  ueras       orir
SFX W   ormir uermas      ormir
SFX W   cir   zcas        ucir
SFX W   ir    yas         [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyas        güir
SFX W   ir    as          ullir
SFX W   ir    as          uñir
SFX W   undir úndas       ehundir
SFX W   erguir yergas      erguir
SFX W   erguir irgas       erguir
SFX W   iar   iemos       iar
SFX W   ar    emos        ebrar
SFX W   ar    emos        edrar
SFX W   gar   guemos      egar
SFX W   ar    emos        elar
SFX W   ar    emos        evar
SFX W   ar    emos        emblar
SFX W   ar    emos        embrar
SFX W   ar    emos        [ae]ndar
SFX W   ar    emos        endrar
SFX W   gar   guemos      engar
SFX W   ar    emos        ensar
SFX W   ar    emos        entar
SFX W   zar   cemos       enzar
SFX W   ar    emos        erbar
SFX W   ar    emos        ernar
SFX W   ar    emos        errar
SFX W   ar    emos        ertar
SFX W   ar    emos        esar
SFX W   ar    emos        estar
SFX W   ar    emos        etar
SFX W   zar   cemos       ezar
SFX W   ar    emos        [aeo]hi[jlnt]ar
SFX W   ar    emos        [ae]hu[ms]ar
SFX W   zar   cemos       [ae]izar
SFX W   ar    emos        [ae][ui][ls]lar
SFX W   ar    emos        au[lnp]ar
SFX W   ar    emos        [ae]inar
SFX W   ar    emos        ehurtar
SFX W   ar    emos        euntar
SFX W   zar   cemos       gonzar
SFX W   ar    emos        [^g]uar
SFX W   uar   üemos       guar
SFX W   ar    emos        obar
SFX W   ar    emos        oblar
SFX W   car   quemos      ocar
SFX W   ar    emos        odar
SFX W   gar   guemos      ogar
SFX W   ar    emos        olar
SFX W   car   quemos      olcar
SFX W   ar    uemos       olgar
SFX W   ar    emos        oldar
SFX W   ar    emos        ollar
SFX W   ar    emos        oltar
SFX W   ar    emos        onar
SFX W   ar    emos        oñar
SFX W   ar    emos        ontar
SFX W   ar    emos        ontrar
SFX W   ar    emos        orar
SFX W   car   quemos      orcar
SFX W   ar    emos        ordar
