windows/es.dic
abarrancar/IPSVWX
abocinar/IPSVWX
abrillantar/PQSTVWXt
acabañar/PSVWX
acanallar/PSVWX
acaudillar/IPSVWX
achatar/IPSVWX
acochinar/PQSTVWXt
acoplar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
acristalar/IPQSTVWXt
acumular/HIOPQRSTVWXrt
adeudar/OPQRSTVWXrt
adrizar/IPSVWX
afeitar/OPQRSTVWXrt
agabachar/PSVWX
agolpar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
agujerear/OPQRSTVWXrt
ahusar/PSWX
alambrar/PSVWX
alcoholizar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
alheñar/PSVWX
almenar/NPSVWX
alufrar/PSVWX
amancillar/PSVWX
amasar/IPSVWX
amillarar/IPSVWX
amortecer/IWX
amusgar/PSVWX
anillar/PQSTVWXt
antorchar/PSVWX
apantanar/PSVWX
apedrear/IOPQRSTVWXrt
apezuñar/PSVWX
apologizar/PSVWX
aproximar/HNOPQRSTVWXrt
arborizar/HPQSTVWXt
arpar/PSVWX
arrendar/IPQSTWXt
arruinar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
asenderear/PSVWX
asolear/OPQRSTVWXrt
atablar/PSVWX
atenuar/HLOPQRSTWXrt
atolondrar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
atresnalar/PSVWX
auscultar/HPQSTVWXt
aventurar/OPQRSTVWXrt
azoar/PSVWX
bailotear/PSVWX
bambalear/OPQRSTVWXrt
barbotear/PSVWX
bascular/LPSVWX
beber/OQRTVWXrt
bisbisear/PQSTVWXt
bocear/PSVWX
borcellar/PSVWX
brillar/LPSVWX
burilar/PSVWX
cabestrear/PSVWX
cafetear/PSVWX
calificar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
camuflar/OPQRSTVWXrt
capitanear/PQSTVWXt
carcomer/VWX
cascamajar/PSVWX
cautivar/PSVWX
centellear/LPSVWX
chaflanar/PSVWX
chapuzar/PSVWX
chillar/PSVWX
chorizar/PQSTVWXt
cilindrar/PSVWX
clamar/PSVWX
coagular/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
cohibir/HOQRTWXrt
comadrear/PSVWX
computar/HOPQRSTUVWXrtu
conglutinar/OPQRSTVWXrt
contar/LOPQRSTUWXrtu
conturbar/HPSVWX
corsear/PSVWX
cromar/PQSTVWXt
cunar/PSVWX
decrepitar/HLPSVWX
demultiplexar/PQSTVWX
desabrigar/OPQRSTVWXrt
desahumar/PSWX
desanudar/PSVWX
desasnar/PSVWX
desbeber/VWX
descantillar/PSVWX
descervigar/IPSVWX
desconsentir/WY
descular/PSVWX
desembridar/PSVWX
desencarecer/QTWXo
desenlazar/PSVWX
desenzarzar/PSVWX
desgañifar/OPRSVWXr
deshidratar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
desladrillar/PSVWX
desmarojar/PSVWX
desoír/QVWYq
despanzurrar/OPQRSTVWXrt
despilarar/IPSVWX
desquijarar/OPQRSTVWXrt
destorgar/PSVWX
desvestir/OQWYoq
dictar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
discrepar/LPSVWX
divertir/IOQWYoq
economizar/PQSTVWXt
embarazar/OPQRSTVWX
emblanquecer/IQTWXt
embrisar/PSVWX
empapuzar/PSVWX
emplastar/IPSVWX
enalmagrar/PSVWX
encalambrar/OPRSVWXr
encapillar/PSVWX
encelajar/OPRSVWXr
encobilar/OPRSVWXr
encuartar/PSVWX
enfervorizar/PSVWX
engarbullar/PSVWX
engringar/OPRSVWXr
enjoyar/OPQRSTVWXrt
enmantar/PSVWX
enredar/OPQRSTVWXrt
ensayar/OPQRSTVWXrt
entender/IOQRTWXrt
entrelinear/PSVWX
envacar/PSVWX
equipar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
escalfecer/ORWXo
escarranchar/OPRSVWXr
escudillar/PSVWX
espadillar/PSVWX
esportear/PQSTVWXt
estebar/PQSTVWXt
estropajear/PSVWX
exhibir/HOQRTUVWXrtu
extranjerizar/PSVWX
fascinar/HLOPQRSTVWXrt
firmar/LOPQRSTUVWXrtu
fosforescer/VWX
fundir/HOQRTUVWXrtu
garrochear/PQSTVWXt
gorjear/PSVWX
guarnecer/QTWXq
harinear/PSVWX
hervir/QWYq
hormiguillar/PSVWX
idolatrar/LPQSTVWXt
imputar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
inervar/HPQSTVWXt
inscribir/OQRTUVWYrtu
intimar/HPSVWX
jadear/LPSVWX
jugar/OPQRSTUWXrtu
lanchar/PSVWX
lentecer/ORWXo
llamear/LPSVWX
machacar/LOPQRSTUVWXrtu
malparir/VWX
manotear/PSVWX
marrar/PQSTVWXt
meditar/HPQSTVWXt
metatizar/PSVWX
mitificar/HPQSTVWXt
montantear/PSVWX
muer/PSVWX
nanear/PSVWX
noruestear/PSVWX
olorizar/PSVWX
otorgar/ILOPQRSTVWXrt
panificar/HPQSTVWXt
pasear/LOPQRSTVWXrt
peluquear/OPQRSTVWXrt
pernear/PSVWX
pimplar/PQSTVWXt
planchar/PQSTVWXt
pololear/PSVWX
precargar/OPQRSTVWX
presentir/IQWYq
prohijar/HIPQSTWXt
puentear/PQSTVWXt
quimificar/HPSVWX
rapuzar/PSVWX
reagravar/HOPQRSTVWXrt
rebozar/OPQRSTUVWXrtu
recercar/PQSTVWXt
reconsiderar/PQSTVWXt
redimir/OQRTVWXrt
refregar/IPSWX
rehuir/OQWYoq
relingar/PSVWX
remullir/QWYt
replantar/HPSVWX
rescaldar/PSVWX
resquebrar/PSWX
retoricar/PSVWX
reverdecer/WX
rodajear/PQSTVWXt
rufianear/PSVWX
salcochar/PSVWX
satanizar/PQSTVWXt
servar/PSVWX
sobajar/IPSVWX
sobresaltar/OPQRSTVWXrt
solidar/OPQRSTVWXrt
sortear/IPSVWX
sucintar/OPRSVWXr
sustraer/OQWYoq
tarascar/PSVWX
tempanar/PSVWX
tipificar/HPQSTVWXt
totalizar/PQSTVWXt
transmitir/OQRTUVWXrtu
trasminar/PSVWX
trepar/LOPQRSTVWXrt
trotar/PSVWX
untar/IOPQRSTVWXrt
vapular/HIPSVWX
versear/PSVWX
volatilizar/HOPRSVWXr
zaparrastrar/PSVWX
